Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4625
Eminent domain authorized.

A city may acquire and appropriate a gas system through the exercise of the power of eminent domain if such power is exercised in the manner specified in and subject to the Municipal Natural Gas System Condemnation Act.

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 2.